Rhode Island statutes. Constitution of the State of Rhode Island
Article XI Of Impeachments

§ 1. Power to impeach — Procedure — Suspension from office impeachment.

The house of representatives shall have the sole power of impeachment. A resolution of impeachment shall not be considered unless it is signed by one-quarter (1/4) of the members. For the purposes of impeachment, the general assembly and the committees thereof shall have the power to compel the attendance of witnesses and production of documents. A vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the members shall be required for an impeachment of the governor. Any officer impeached shall thereby be suspended from the office until judgment in the case shall have been pronounced.

History of Section.

Proposed amendments to Article XI, Section 1 by Joint Resolutions 184 and 193 of 1994 were approved by a majority of the electorate voting in a statewide election on November 8, 1994.

§ 2. Trial of impeachments.

All impeachments shall be tried by the senate; and when sitting for that purpose, they shall be under oath or affirmation. No person shall be convicted except by vote of two-thirds of the members elected. When the governor is impeached, the chief or presiding justice of the supreme court, for the time being, shall preside, with a casting vote in all preliminary questions.

§ 3. Officers subject to impeachment — Grounds and effect of conviction.

The governor and all other executive and judicial officers shall be liable to impeachment. The governor or any other executive officer shall be removed from office if, upon impeachment, such officer shall be found incapacitated or guilty of the commission of a felony or crime of moral turpitude, misfeasance or malfeasance in office. Judges shall be removed if, upon impeachment, they shall be found incapacitated or guilty of the commission of a felony or crime of moral turpitude, misfeasance or malfeasance in office or violation of the canons of judicial ethics. Judgment of incapacity or guilt in a case of impeachment shall not extend further than to removal from office. The person convicted shall, nevertheless, be liable to indictment, trial and punishment, according to laws.